Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.72.280

Concise description for alternative to initiative to the legislature.

For a measure designated as "Alternative Measure No. . . . . B," the secretary of state shall obtain from the measure adopting the alternative, or otherwise the attorney general, a concise description of the alternative measure that differs from the concise description of the original initiative and indicates as clearly as possible the essential differences between the two measures.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1828. Prior: 2000 c 197 s 6; 1965 c 9 s 29.79.290; prior: 1913 c 138 s 22, part; RRS s 5418, part. Formerly RCW 29.79.290.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2000 c 197: See note following RCW 29A.72.050.